Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-1741.04
Handicapped
parking citation; requirements; procedure; waivers; dismissal; credit card;
payment authorized.

When a handicapped parking
citation is issued for a handicapped parking infraction, the person issuing
the handicapped parking citation shall enter thereon all required information,
including the name and address of the cited person or, if not known, the license
number and description of the offending motor vehicle, the offense charged,
and the time and place the person cited is to appear in court. Unless the
person cited requests an earlier date, the time of appearance shall be at
least three days after the issuance of the handicapped parking citation. One
copy of the handicapped parking citation shall be delivered to the person
cited or attached to the offending motor vehicle. At least twenty-four hours
before the time set for the appearance of the cited person, either the prosecuting
attorney or other person authorized by law to issue a complaint for the particular
offense shall issue and file a complaint charging such person with a handicapped
parking infraction or such person shall be released from the obligation to
appear as specified. A person cited for a handicapped parking violation may
waive his or her right to trial. For any handicapped parking citation issued
for a handicapped parking infraction by reason of the failure of a vehicle
to display a handicapped or
disabled parking permit, the complaint shall be dismissed if, within seven
business days after the date of issuance of the citation, the person cited
files with the court the affidavit provided for in section 18-1741.03, signed
by a peace officer certifying that the recipient is the lawful possessor in
his or her own right of a handicapped or
disabled parking permit and that the peace officer
has personally viewed the permit. The Supreme Court may prescribe uniform
rules for such waivers. Anyone may use a credit card authorized by the court
in which the person is cited as a means of payment of his or her fine and
costs.

Laws 1993, LB 632, § 4;

Laws 1996, LB 1211, § 11;

Laws 2011, LB163, § 11.